Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4063.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 6d. (1) For 2 years after leaving office, a former governor, former lieutenant governor, or former head of a principal department of the executive branch of state government shall not make expenditures for or receive compensation or reimbursement for actual expenses for lobbying that equal or exceed the limit established to require registration as a lobbyist agent. This subsection applies to a governor, lieutenant governor, or head of a principal department whose term of office begins on or after January 1, 2027. (2) An individual who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) Nothing in this section prevents a former governor, former lieutenant governor, or former head of a principal department of the executive branch of state government from taking a new position within state government or running for an elected office. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor